test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-anneed_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - anneeđ: # MLO, checked

    anneeđ+V+Inf: anneeđ
    anneeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: onnuum
    anneeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: onnuuh
    anneeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: annoo
    anneeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: annojeen
    anneeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: onnuv
    anneeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: onnup
    anneeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: annojeh
    anneeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: onnuu
    anneeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: annojim
    anneeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: onnui
    anneeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: annojii
